Utah statutes.
58-71-306.   Status of licenses held on the effective date of this chapter.
An individual holding a current license as a naturopathic physician that was
issued under prior Utah law is considered to hold a current license and
retains the scope of practice authorized under this title prior to the
enactment of this chapter.
